District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-920

Removal of directors and officers; vote required for approval; vacancies.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 485, ch. 397, § 20
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-920.
1981 Ed., § 29-1120.
1973 Ed., § 29-820.